Utah statutes.
4-14-10.   Pesticide Committee created -- Composition -- Terms -- Compensation -- Duties.

(1)  There is created a Pesticide Committee comprising nine persons appointed by the governor to four-year terms of office, one member from each of the following state agencies and organizations:

(a)  Utah State Agricultural Extension Service;

(b)  Department of Agriculture and Food;

(c)  Department of Health;

(d)  Division of Wildlife Resources;

(e)  Department of Environmental Quality;

(f)  Utah Pest Control Association;

(g)  agricultural chemical industry;

(h)  Utah Farmers Union; and

(i)  Utah Farm Bureau Federation.

(2)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (1), the governor shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust the length of terms to ensure that the terms of committee members are staggered so that approximately half of the committee is appointed every two years.

(3)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement shall be appointed for the unexpired term.

(4)  The committee shall elect one of its members to serve as chair.  The chair is responsible for the call and conduct of meetings of the Pesticide Committee.

(5)  Attendance of a simple majority of the members constitutes a quorum for the transaction of official business.

(6)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(a)  Section 63A-3-106;

(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and

(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.

(7)  The Pesticide Committee shall make recommendations to the commissioner regarding making rules pertaining to the sale, distribution, use, and disposal of pesticides.

